Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.458

Occupational and environmental research facility—Acceptance of loans, gifts, etc.—Presentment of vouchers for payments from accident and medical aid funds.

The University of Washington may accept and administer loans, grants, funds, or gifts, conditional or otherwise, in furtherance of the objects and purposes of RCW 28B.20.450 through 28B.20.458, from the federal government and from other sources public or private. For the purpose of securing payment from the accident fund and medical aid fund as funds are required, vouchers shall be presented to the department of labor and industries.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.458. Prior: 1963 c 151 s 5. Formerly RCW 28.77.418.]